Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
In General

§ 49-19-1.
State forestry commission; membership; compensation; organization.

There shall be a State Forestry Commission composed of ten (10) members, who shall be qualified electors of the state. The Dean of the School of Forest Resources at Mississippi State University shall be an ex officio member of the commission, with full voting authority. The Governor shall appoint eight (8) members, with the advice and consent of the Senate, for a term of six (6) years. The Governor shall appoint one (1) member from each congressional district as constituted at the time the appointments are made and shall appoint the remainder of the members from the state at large. A member from a congressional district must be a certified tree farmer who owns eighty (80) or more acres of forest land or a person who derives a major portion of his or her personal income from forest-related business, industry or other related activities. Members of the commission from the state at large may or may not possess the same qualifications as members appointed from the congressional districts.

The members of the commission shall receive no annual salary but each member of the commission shall receive a per diem plus expenses and mileage as authorized by law for each day devoted to the discharge of official duties. No member of the commission shall receive total per diem in excess of twenty-four (24) days’ compensation per annum.

If a vacancy occurs in the office of an appointed member of the commission, the vacancy shall be filled by appointment for the balance of the unexpired term.

The commission shall elect from its membership a chair, who shall preside over meetings, and a vice chair, who shall preside in the absence of the chair or when the chair is excused.

The commission shall adopt rules and regulations governing times and places for meetings, and governing the manner of conducting its business. Each member of the commission shall take the oath prescribed by Section 268 of the Mississippi Constitution of 1890 and shall enter into a bond in the amount of Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00) to be approved by the Secretary of State, conditioned according to law and payable to the State of Mississippi before assuming the duties of office.

Any appointment made to the commission contrary to this section shall be void, and it is unlawful for the State Fiscal Officer to pay any per diem or authorize the expenses of the appointee.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6164; 1942, § 6022; Laws, 1926, ch. 161; Laws, 1964, ch. 241, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1966, ch. 276, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 359, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 560, § 24; Laws, 1981, ch. 305, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 597, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 571, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2006; Laws, 2018, ch. 395, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 49-19-3.
Selection and qualifications of state forester; other duties and powers of the commission [Paragraph (j) repealed effective June 30, 2022].

The duties and powers of the commission shall be:

To appoint a State Forester, who shall serve at the will and pleasure of the commission and who is qualified to perform the duties as set forth herein; and to pay him such salary as is provided by the Legislature, and allow him such office expenses incidental to the performance of his official duties as the commission, in its discretion, may deem necessary; and to charge him with the immediate direction and control, subject to the supervision and approval of the commission, of all matters relating to forestry as authorized herein. Any person appointed by the commission as State Forester shall have received a bachelor’s degree in forestry from an accredited school or college of forestry and shall be licensed and registered under the provisions of the Mississippi Foresters Registration Law (Section 73-36-1 et seq.) and in addition shall have had at least five (5) years’ administrative experience in a forestry-related field.

To take such action and provide and maintain such organized means as may seem necessary and expedient to prevent, control and extinguish forest fires, including the enforcement of any and all laws pertaining to the protection of forests and woodland.

To encourage forest and tree planting for the production of a wood crop, for the protection of water supply, for windbreak and shade, or for any other beneficial purposes contributing to the general welfare, public hygiene and comfort of the people.

To cause to be made such technical investigations and studies concerning forest conditions, the propagation, care and protection of forest and shade trees, the care and management of forests, their growth, yield and the products and by-products thereof, and any other competent subject, including forest taxation, bearing on the timber supply and needs of the state, which the commission, in its discretion, may deem proper.

To assist and cooperate with any federal or state department or institution, county, town, corporation or individual, under such terms as in the judgment of the commission will best serve the public interest, in the preparation and execution of plans for the protection, management, replacement, or extension of the forest, woodland and roadside or other ornamental tree growth in the state.

To encourage public interest in forestry by means of correspondence, the public press, periodicals, the publication of bulletins and leaflets for general distribution, the delivery of lectures in the schools and other suitable means, and to cooperate to the fullest extent with the extension department services of the state colleges in promoting reforestation. It shall be the duty of the State Forester to cooperate with private timber owners in laying plans for the protection, management and replacement of forests and in aiding them to form protection associations. It shall be his duty to examine all timbered lands belonging to the state and its institutions and report to the commission upon their timber conditions and actual value, and also whether some of these lands may not be held as state forests. He shall be responsible for the protection and management of lands donated, purchased or belonging to the state or state institutions, and all other lands reserved by the state as state forests.

To control the expenditure of any and all funds appropriated or otherwise made available for the several purposes set forth herein under suitable regulations and restrictions by the commission and to specifically authorize any officer or employee of the commission to incur necessary and stipulated expenses in connection with the work in which such person may be engaged.

To submit annually to the Legislature a report of the expenditures, proceedings and results achieved, together with such other matters including recommendations concerning legislation as are germane to the aims and purposes of this chapter.

To create, establish and organize the State of Mississippi into forestry districts for the most effective and efficient administration of the commission.

To appoint, upon the State Forester’s recommendation, six (6) individuals who shall be designated Mississippi Forestry Commission Law Enforcement Officers with authority to bear arms, investigate and make arrests; however, the law enforcement duties and authority of the officers shall be limited to woods arson. The officers shall comply with applicable minimum educational and training standards for law enforcement officers. These officers may issue citations for any violation of those laws for recklessly or with gross negligence causing fire to burn the lands of another. A citation issued by a Forestry Commission law enforcement officer shall be issued on a uniform citation form consisting of an original and at least two (2) copies. Such citation shall show, among other necessary information, the name of the issuing officer, the name of the court in which the cause is to be heard and the date and time the person charged with a violation is to appear to answer the charge. The uniform citation form shall make a provision on it for information that will constitute a complaint charging the offense for which the citation was issued and, when duly sworn to and filed with a court of competent jurisdiction, prosecution may proceed under that complaint. For the purposes of this paragraph, the fact that any person is found to have a brush or debris pile or other material which is or was being burned and reasonable and prudent efforts were not taken to prevent the spread of the fire onto the lands of another shall be evidence that such person recklessly or with gross negligence caused the land to burn.

This paragraph shall stand repealed on June 30, 2022.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6165; 1942, § 6023; Laws, 1926, ch. 161; Laws, 1950, ch. 224; Laws, 1954, ch. 186; Laws, 1958, chs. 192, 341; Laws, 1966, ch. 445, § 15; Laws, 1970, ch. 296, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 305, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 329, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 546, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 523, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 495, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 332, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 571, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 317, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 353, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 446, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 27, 2014); Laws, 2018, ch. 371, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018, eff from and after July 1, 2018; Laws, 2018, ch. 395, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

Joint Legislative Committee Note —

Section 1 of Chapter 371, Laws of 2018, effective from and after July 1, 2018 (approved March 16, 2018), amended this section. Section 8 of Chapter 395, Laws of 2018, effective from and after July 1, 2018 (approved March 191, 2018), also amended this section. As set out above, this section reflects the language of all amendments pursuant to
Section 1-1-109 which gives the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision, and Publication of Legislation authority to integrate amendments so that all versions of the same code section amended within the same legislative session may become effective. The Joint Committee on Compilation, Revision, and Publication of Legislation ratified the integration of these amendments as consistent with the legislative intent at the August 14, 2018, meeting of the Committee.

Section 1 of ch. 332, Laws of 2006, effective from and after passage (approved March 9, 2006), amended this section. Section 2 of ch. 571, Laws of 2006, effective from and after July 1, 2006 (approved April 24, 2006), also amended this section. As set out above, this section reflects the language of Section 2 of ch. 571, Laws of 2006, pursuant to
Section 1-3-79 which provides that whenever the same section of law is amended by different bills during the same legislative session, and the effective dates of the amendments are the same, the amendment with the latest approval date shall supersede all other amendments to the same section approved on an earlier date.

§ 49-19-5.
Acquisition and disposal of property.

The State Forestry Commission is hereby authorized and empowered to acquire and dispose of property of all kinds in accordance with the provisions of Section 29-1-1, in order to discharge the duties as set forth in Section 49-19-3, and subsequent germane general laws of the State of Mississippi. It is further authorized to sell, rent, lease, and dispose of any property acquired by the commission, all property to be sold or disposed of shall be sold or disposed of in the manner provided by law for the sale or disposition of surplus property by other state agencies. Any funds received from the sale, rental or lease of any property herein authorized, to be acquired, shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of a special account, and the commission is hereby authorized to use this fund for the replacement, repairs, and upkeep of any property authorized to be acquired and owned under this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6023-01; Laws, 1944, ch. 223, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 212; Laws, 1993, ch. 615, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 49-19-7.
Control pine beetle epidemics and other timber insects and pests.

The Mississippi Forestry Commission shall keep itself informed as to the known varieties of pine beetles and other timber insect pests and diseases, the origin, locality, nature and appearance thereof, the manner in which they are disseminated, and approved methods of treatment, control and eradication. The commission shall from time to time make rules and regulations for carrying out the provisions and requirements of this section, including rules and regulations under which its employees shall (1) inspect places, timber, and timber products, and other things and substances used or connected therewith, (2) investigate, control, eradicate and prevent the dissemination of pine beetles and other timber insect pests and diseases, and (3) supervise or cause the treatment, cutting and destruction of timber or timber products and other things infested or infected therewith. The commission’s employees shall have authority to carry out and execute the regulations and orders of the commission and shall have authority, under direction of the commission, to carry out provisions of this section.

The Mississippi Forestry Commission and its employees shall have the authority to enter upon any and all timber lands for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this section.

All known varieties of pine beetles and other insect pests and diseases infesting or infecting or likely to infest or infect timber or timber products in this state shall be listed by the state forestry commission, and every such variety of pine beetle and every such insect pest or disease listed and all timber and timber products infested or infected therewith are hereby declared to be a public nuisance.

Before entering upon any lands for the purpose of removing any infested or infected timber having a value in excess of one hundred dollars ($100.00), where the owner of such land will not cause the removal of such infested or infected timber, the forestry commission shall first secure an order of the chancery court in term time or in vacation authorizing the commission to effect such removal. Process on any resident owner in any such proceeding shall be served as other process, and process on any non-resident owner shall be had by mailing such process by registered mail, return receipt requested, to the last known address of such non-resident or by publication in three weekly issues of a newspaper published in the county where such timber land is located if no mailing address is known. Any hearing under provisions of this section may be set at any time five days after date of service of process, or in case of publication five days after completion of such publication.

It is the purpose of this section to authorize and empower the state forestry commission to control disease or insect infections or infestations in timber and timber products within this state. It is not the purpose of this section to transfer any powers from the state plant board to the state forestry commission. Use of the word “timber” shall be deemed to refer to such trees as are normally used in the manufacture of lumber and the term “timber products” shall be deemed to refer to products manufactured from such trees normally used in the manufacture of lumber.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6023-05; Laws, 1954, ch. 183, §§ 1-5.

§ 49-19-9.
Fire protection services for Choctaw Indian lands.

The State Forestry Commission is hereby authorized to extend fire protection services to the Choctaw Indian lands located in Attala, Kemper, Leake, Neshoba, Newton, Jones and Scott Counties, Mississippi.

The State Forestry Commission is authorized to accept from the Choctaw Agency adequate compensation for fire detection and suppression, which sum may be used by the forestry commission in its fire protection work.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6023-11; Laws, 1964, ch. 242, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1989, ch. 514, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 49-19-11.
Land adjacent to protective areas, etc.

The State Forestry Commission is hereby authorized to protect intermingled or adjacent state owned lands in the same manner and form as other lands within the state and the expenses thereof may be paid out of any appropriation made to the State Forestry Commission; provided such expenditures are not greater per acre in any year than the expenditures by the commission on account of the protection of any other lands than that owned by the State of Mississippi.

The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to the protection of established state parks, state forests or other state owned lands when increased expenditure may be necessary for the protection thereof in the opinion of the State Forestry Commission.

It is hereby made the duty of all agents and employees of the State Forestry Commission to report to the commission any timber or other trespass discovered by such agent or employees on state owned lands giving detailed information thereof in such report.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6041; Laws, 1936, ch. 223; Laws, 1989, ch. 514, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 49-19-13.
Part of severance tax may be donated by county.

The boards of supervisors of the several counties are hereby authorized, in their discretion, to appropriate and pay to the state forestry commission from the general fund of the county each year a sum of money not exceeding twenty-five per cent of the forest severance tax received by the county the preceding year. Such money so appropriated shall be used by the state forestry commission for forestry work and protection in such county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6043; Laws, 1942, ch. 220.

§ 49-19-15.
Appropriations.

The state forestry fund when made available by proper appropriation by the Legislature, shall be expended by the commission in carrying out and enforcing all laws pertaining to the protection of forests as the commission may direct, the vouchers to be drawn and paid as by other departments of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6171; 1942, § 6028; Laws, 1926, ch. 161.

§ 49-19-17.
Study of forestry in schools and colleges.

The state and county boards of public education are directed to provide for proper courses of instruction by textbooks, or lectures on the general subject of forestry in all the public schools and colleges of this state; and they are further directed to provide for the celebration of arbor day by all public schools, on which day ornamental and shade trees, flowers, etc., are to be placed, where practicable, on the grounds surrounding all public schoolhouses.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6167; 1942, § 6025; Laws, 1926, ch. 161.

§ 49-19-19.
Free commercial tree seedlings for farm owners and schools.

To encourage better land use, to assist in controlling headwaters, to prevent soil erosion, to help increase community and individual farm incomes, and to assist schools in forest education and timber management, the Mississippi Forestry Commission is hereby authorized to produce and make available to farm owners and to schools of this state, having lands contiguous to the school site suitable for reforestation, free commercial tree seedlings not to exceed five thousand (5,000) trees per farm owner per year, and not to exceed five thousand (5,000) trees per school, providing the farm owner or owners and school trustees desiring such seedlings enter into a cooperative agreement with the state forestry commission assuring the commission of the proper planting, care, and protection of all seedlings thus furnished from fire and wasteful cutting. The minimum number of seedlings furnished any consignee under this section shall not be less than one thousand (1,000).

In its cooperative agreement, the Mississippi Forestry Commission may provide for the payment to it of a penalty of not exceeding Ten Dollars ($10.00) per thousand trees for each thousand or part thereof planted in violation of the purposes and intent of this section.

The Mississippi Forestry Commission is hereby authorized to use such funds as it may have available in carrying out the intent and purposes of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6046-31; Laws, 1946, ch. 447, §§ 1-3.

§ 49-19-21.
How moneys contributed by government spent.

All moneys received from the United States government for protection of forest lands, for reforestation of denuded areas, for extension of national forests, and to promote the continuous production of timber shall be credited to said state forestry fund, and expended by the commission as is directed by the federal government.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6170; 1942, § 6027; Laws, 1926, ch. 161.

§ 49-19-23.
Federal funds; apportionment.

All moneys paid to the State of Mississippi by the United States, on account of national forest lands in Mississippi, established under the provisions of the Weeks Law, so-called, being an Act of Congress, approved March 1, 1911, and amendments thereto, shall be apportioned by the state treasurer to the several counties in which such national forest lands are or may be, in proportion to the area of such national forest lands in each, as determined by the forest service of the United States Department of Agriculture.

The several sums so apportioned to each county shall be paid over by the state treasurer to the county depository within sixty (60) days after receipt thereof, and fifty percent (50%) of such funds received by the county shall be expended for the benefit of the public schools, and the remaining fifty percent (50%) of such funds shall, in the discretion of the board of supervisors, be expended for the benefit of the public roads or of the public schools of the school districts within which national forest lands may be located.

In any area affected not having a school located therein, all of such funds may be expended on roads.

In counties containing one hundred sixty thousand, two hundred fifty-three (160,253) acres of national forest lands located solely within three (3) supervisors districts, if the board of supervisors elects to apportion fifty percent (50%) of the funds so received to public roads, the funds shall be expended upon the public roads within the supervisors district or districts within which the national forest lands are located.

In counties containing one hundred sixty thousand, two hundred fifty-three (160,253) acres of national forest lands located solely within three (3) supervisors districts, that portion of the funds allocated to public schools may, within the discretion of the county school board, be expended for the public schools within the county wherein the national forest lands are located.

In any county wherein there is located a national forest traversed by the Chickasawhay River and in which U. S. Highways 84 and 45 intersect, all such funds so received shall be expended in such manner as the board of supervisors shall determine in the public interest for the maintenance of public roads and support of the public schools.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6044; Laws, 1936, ch. 310; Laws, 1950, ch. 269; Laws, 1952, ch. 195; Laws, 1956, ch. 161; Laws, 1970, ch. 320, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1970.

§ 49-19-25.
Fires declared nuisances; abandoned open cisterns and wells declared nuisances; abatement.

Any fire on any forested, cutover, brush lands or grass lands burning uncontrolled is hereby declared a public nuisance by reason of its menace to life and property. Any person, firm or corporation negligently or wilfully and maliciously responsible for the starting or the existence of such fire on land other than his own is hereby required to control or extinguish it immediately, and if said person, firm or corporation shall wilfully refuse, neglect or fail to do so, any organized fire suppression agency recognized by the Mississippi Forestry Commission, may summarily abate the nuisance thus constituted by controlling or extinguishing the fire. The cost of abating such nuisance, with all costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to be allowed by the court, may be recovered from the person, firm or corporation responsible for such nuisance by civil action in the proper court, action for said recovery to be filed by the agency abating the nuisance. This section shall not impair any remedy now allowed by law.

Any open cistern or well, which has been abandoned or is no longer used for the purpose of a cistern or well is hereby declared to be a public nuisance by reason of its menace to life and property, and the Mississippi Forestry Commission is hereby authorized to seal such cistern or well upon request of the landowner. A reasonable fee shall be charged for this purpose and all fees collected shall be handled in the same manner as other service charges collected by the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6046, Laws, 1940, ch. 219; Laws, 1970, ch. 298, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 6, 1970).

§ 49-19-27.
Tree Seedling Revolving Fund; reforestation.

There is created in the State Treasury a fund designated as the Tree Seedling Revolving Fund. The State Forestry Commission shall use the fund to contract for the production or purchase of tree seedlings, for resale to Mississippi landowners for reforestation.

The Tree Seedling Revolving Fund shall be funded by monies received from the sale of contract seedlings to Mississippi landowners. Monies collected from the sales shall be deposited into the Tree Seedling Revolving Fund. The State Treasurer shall make disbursements for payment of production or purchase of seedlings upon requisition by the Forestry Commission and upon the issuance of warrants by the Department of Finance and Administration.

The Tree Seedling Revolving Fund is created to supplement the State Forestry Commission’s seedling production capacity and not for its replacement.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 351; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 648, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 320, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 8, 2000.).

§ 49-19-31.
Joint Study Committee on Forestry.

There is hereby created a Joint Study Committee on Forestry in Mississippi. The committee shall study and make recommendations, including recommended legislation regarding the Forestry Commission, coordination of forestry policy, the coordination of overlapping conservation practices by state agencies, the seedling shortage and other matters related to the forestry industry.

The committee shall be composed of the following members:

The Chairman of the Senate Forestry Committee, Chairman of the Senate Agriculture Committee, and two (2) members of the forestry committee appointed by the Lieutenant Governor.

The Chairman of the House Agriculture Committee and three (3) members of the agriculture committee appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

The Chairman of the Senate Forestry Committee and the Chairman of the House Agriculture Committee shall serve as co-chairs of the committee.

The members of the joint committee shall be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same manner as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session and shall obtain the approval of their respective management committees for per diem and travel expense expenditures of the committee.

The committee shall utilize clerical and legal staff employed by the Legislature and may utilize any assistance made available to it by any state agency.

Upon presentation of its final report the committee shall be dissolved.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 597, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 49-19-33.
Southern Regional Fire Training Center renamed the Richard (Dick) Allen Building.

The Southern Regional Fire Training Center Building located in Pearl, Mississippi, shall be renamed the Richard (Dick) Allen Building. The Department of Finance and Administration shall prepare or have prepared a distinctive plaque, to be placed in a prominent place within the Richard (Dick) Allen Building which states the background, accomplishments and service to Mississippi of Richard Allen as Executive Director of the State Forestry Commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 317, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.